trunk/resultats/catalan.dic
abatés/PZ
abelliré/MNZ
abrasiré/MNZ
absolia/OZ
abstreia/OZ
accediré/MNZ
acolloniré/MNZ
aconseguiré/MNZ
acreixia/OZ
acreixés/PZ
adheriré/MNZ
admetia/OZ
admetés/PZ
adquiriré/MNZ
adscrivia/OZ
afegiré/MNZ
afranquiré/MNZ
agrairé/MNZ
aiguabatia/OZ
aiguabatés/PZ
aigualiré/MNZ
ajeia/OZ
alabatia/OZ
alabatés/PZ
al·ludiré/MNZ
amarriré/MNZ
amorroniré/MNZ
apareixia/OZ
apercebia/OZ
apercebés/PZ
apetiré/MNZ
aprehenia/OZ
aprenia/OZ
argüiré/MNZ
arremetia/OZ
arremetés/PZ
arrupiré/MNZ
asseia/OZ
assentiré/MNZ
assoliré/MNZ
atapeiré/MNZ
atenia/OZ
atenyia/OZ
atenyés/PZ
atordiré/MNZ
atreia/OZ
autocompadiré/MNZ
avorriré/MNZ
bastiré/MN
batia/DO
batés/P
bestreia/O
bevia/O
boniré/MN
botia/O
botés/P
brogiré/MN
brusiré/MN
cabia/O
cabés/P
calia/O
capiré/MN
carvenia/O
cernia/O
cernés/P
circuiré/MN
circumscrivia/O
cloïa/O
coexistiré/MN
colia/O
colltorcia/O
colltorcés/P
colpiré/MN
combatia/O
combatés/P
cometia/O
cometés/P
commovia/O
compadiré/MN
compareixia/O
competiré/MN
complaia/O
complanyia/O
complanyés/P
componia/O
comprenia/O
comprometia/O
comprometés/P
comuniré/MN
concebia/O
concebés/P
concloïa/O
condiré/MN
condoldia/O
coneixia/O
confluiré/MN
confonia/O
consistiré/MN
constrenyia/O
constrenyés/P
contendiré/MN
contenia/O
contorcia/O
contorcés/P
contrabatia/O
contrabatés/P
contreia/O
convencia/O
convencés/P
convertiré/MN
convivia/O
corfonia/O
corprenia/O
corroiré/MN
corrompia/O
corrompés/P
creia/O
creixés/P
debatia/O
debatés/P
decatiré/MN
decebés/P
decreixia/O
decreixés/P
deferiré/MN
deixondiré/MN
demetia/O
demetés/P
departiré/MN
dequeia/O
derruiré/MN
desafavoriré/MN
desaprenia/O
descendiré/MN
descloïa/O
descompartiré/MN
descomprometia/O
descomprometés/P
descreia/O
desembalbiré/MN
desemmelangiré/MN
desempudeiré/MN
desendolciré/MN
desenganduliré/MN
desengruixiré/MN
desenlletgiré/MN
desentenebriré/MN
desentenia/O
desentumiré/MN
desfrunziré/MN
desjunyiré/MN
desmereixés/P
desobeiré/MN
desordiré/MN
despenia/O
desponia/O
dessaboriré/MN
destituiré/MN
destorcia/O
destorcés/P
destrenyés/P
desvestiré/MN
desvivia/O
devia/O
difluiré/MN
dirigiré/MN
disminuiré/MN
dissolia/O
distingiré/MN
distorcia/O
distorcés/P
dividiré/MN
dolia/O
eixarreiré/MNZ
elegiré/MNZ
embadaliré/MNZ
embastardiré/MNZ
embogiré/MNZ
embotiré/MNZ
embrutiré/MNZ
emetia/OZ
emetés/PZ
emmaleiré/MNZ
emmarciré/MNZ
emmusteiré/MNZ
empegueiré/MNZ
empenyés/PZ
empobriré/MNZ
emprenia/OZ
empudentiré/MNZ
enaspriré/MNZ
encalliré/MNZ
encloïa/OZ
encobeiré/MNZ
encondoliré/MNZ
endarreriré/MNZ
endropiré/MNZ
enfelloniré/MNZ
enferotgiré/MNZ
enfondés/PZ
enforfoguiré/MNZ
enfredoriré/MNZ
engallofiré/MNZ
engelabriré/MNZ
engolosiré/MNZ
engrandiré/MNZ
enllaminiré/MNZ
ennegriré/MNZ
enrigidiré/MNZ
ensenyoriré/MNZ
entemoniré/MNZ
entenia/OZ
entrebatés/PZ
entreferiré/MNZ
entremetia/OZ
entremetés/PZ
envaniré/MNZ
envilaniré/MNZ
equivalia/OZ
esbargiré/MNZ
esbatés/PZ
escarpiré/MNZ
escometia/OZ
escometés/PZ
esduiré/MNZ
espairé/MNZ
espenyia/OZ
espenyés/PZ
espremés/PZ
espunyiré/MNZ
esqueia/OZ
estorcia/OZ
estorcés/PZ
estordiré/MNZ
estrenyés/PZ
excediré/MNZ
excloïa/OZ
expandiré/MNZ
extreia/OZ
falliré/MN
fenyia/O
fenyés/P
fluiré/MN
fotia/O
fotés/P
fumés/P
garfiré/MN
heuia/OZ
heués/PZ
imbuiré/MNZ
incompliré/MNZ
infonia/OZ
inhibiré/MNZ
interferiré/MNZ
interrompia/OZ
interrompés/PZ
ireixés/PZ
irrompia/OZ
irrompés/PZ
junyiré/MN
lleia/O
malmetia/O
malmetés/P
malvenia/O
malveués/P
malvivia/O
manumetia/O
manumetés/P
marciré/MN
menyscreia/O
mereixés/P
metia/O
metés/P
movia/O
negligiré/MN
només/P
noïa/O
oferiré/MNZ
olia/DOZ
ometés/PZ
pareixia/O
patiré/MN
peixés/P
percebia/O
percebés/P
perdés/P
permetia/O
permetés/P
pernabatés/P
persistiré/MN
pertanyia/O
pertanyés/P
plaia/O
planyés/P
plovia/O
preexcel·liré/MN
premia/DO
premés/P
prescrivia/O
presumiré/MN
prevalia/O
prometés/P
promovia/O
prorrompés/P
proscrivia/O
prosseguiré/MN
raia/O
reabsorbiré/MN
readmetia/O
readmetés/P
rebatia/O
rebatés/P
rebia/O
rebotés/P
rebés/P
recloïa/O
reconeixia/O
reconqueriré/MN
recreixia/O
recreixés/P
redimiré/MN
refloriré/MN
refonia/O
reinseriré/MN
remetia/O
remetés/P
remordiré/MN
removia/O
repoliré/MN
resolia/O
resplendiré/MN
restrenyia/O
restrenyés/P
retonia/O
retorcés/P
retraduiré/MN
retransmetia/O
retransmetés/P
retrotreia/O
retés/P
revencia/O
revencés/P
reveriré/MN
revivia/O
rompia/O
rompés/P
seduiré/MN
seia/O
sobrecreixés/P
sobreentenia/O
sobreprenia/O
sobrevalia/O
solia/O
solsiré/MN
somreia/O
sostreia/O
sotbatia/O
sotbatés/P
sotmetés/P
subscrivia/O
subvertiré/MN
teledirigiré/MN
temia/O
temés/P
terratremés/P
tolia/O
torcia/O
torcés/P
trametés/P
transcrivia/O
transgrediré/MN
transmetia/O
transmetés/P
tremia/O
tremés/P
uniré/MNZ
valia/O
vencés/P
venia/O
